Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. Oil Pollution Control.
Sec. 46.04.045.
Adjustment of dollar amounts.

The dollar amounts in AS

46.04.040

change, as provided in this section, according to and to the extent of changes in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the Anchorage metropolitan area compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor (the index). The index for January 1990 is the reference base index.

The dollar amounts change on October 1 of each third year according to the percentage change between the index for January of that year and the most recent index used to determine whether to change the dollar amounts. After calculation of the new amounts, the resulting amounts shall be rounded to the nearest cent.

If the index is revised, the percentage of change is calculated on the basis of the revised index. If a revision of the index changes the reference base index, a revised reference base index is determined by multiplying the reference base index applicable by the rebasing factor furnished by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. If the index is superseded, the index referred to in this section is the one represented by the Bureau of Labor Statistics as reflecting most accurately changes in the purchasing power of the dollar for Alaskan consumers.

The department shall adopt a regulation announcing

on or before June 30 of each third year, the changes in dollar amounts required by (b) of this section; and

promptly after the changes occur, changes in the index required by (c) of this section, including, if applicable, the numerical equivalent of the reference base index under a revised reference base index and the designation or title of any index superseding the index.

The department shall also provide notification of a change in dollar amounts required under (b) of this section to the clerks of court in each judicial district of the state.

History.

(§ 19 ch 191 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 46.04.047.
Noncrude oil operations.

Notwithstanding AS

46.04.040

, the department may, with respect to noncrude oil operations, approve proof of financial responsibility by a person, other than the applicant, who does not agree to be subject to a direct action in the state or to appoint an agent for service of process if the applicant

provides proof of financial responsibility in the form and amounts otherwise required under AS

46.04.040

;

provides a sworn statement that

is acceptable to the department;

attests that the applicant has diligently attempted to obtain a form of proof of financial responsibility that would provide for a direct action and appointment of an agent for service of process;

describes the steps the applicant has taken to obtain a form of proof of financial responsibility that would provide for a direct action and appointment of an agent for service of process;

states that a form of proof of financial responsibility that would provide for a direct action and appointment of an agent for service of process is unavailable to the applicant;

continues diligent efforts to obtain a form of proof of financial responsibility that would provide for a direct action and appointment of an agent for service of process and provides a sworn statement every six months that is acceptable to the department, containing the information required in (2) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Originally enacted as temporary law, to be repealed June 1, 1994. The repealer was repealed by § 2, ch. 12, SLA 1994, and the section was codified.

Sec. 46.04.050.
Exemptions.

The provisions of AS

46.04.030

,

46.04.040

, and

46.04.060

do not apply to an oil terminal facility that has an effective storage capacity of less than 5,000 barrels of crude oil or less than 10,000 barrels of noncrude oil.

The provisions of AS

46.04.030

and

46.04.040

do not apply to a natural gas production facility and a natural gas terminal facility; for purposes of this subsection, “natural gas production facility” and “natural gas terminal facility” mean a platform, facility, or structure that, except for storage of refined petroleum products in a quantity that does not exceed 10,000 barrels, is used solely for the production, compression, storage, or transport of natural gas.

The provisions of AS

46.04.030

and

46.04.040

do not apply to a natural gas exploration facility if the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission has determined under AS

31.05.030(l)

that evidence obtained through evaluation demonstrates with reasonable certainty that all of the wells at a natural gas exploration facility will not penetrate a formation capable of flowing oil to the ground surface. If the drilling of a well at an exploration facility exempted under this subsection does penetrate a formation capable of flowing oil to the surface, the owner or operator shall submit an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan and proof of financial responsibility to the department to meet the requirements of AS

46.04.030

and

46.04.040

. For purposes of this subsection, “natural gas exploration facility” means a platform, facility, or structure that, except for storage of refined petroleum products in a quantity that does not exceed 10,000 barrels, is used solely for the exploration for natural gas.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 191 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1992; am §§ 4, 5 ch 79 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Subsection (b) exempts liquefied natural gas tankers from the contingency planning and financial responsibility requirements of AS

46.04.030

and

46.04.040

. Apr. 2, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen. (Issued before 2005 amendment.)

Sec. 46.04.055.
Nontank vessels and railroad tank cars.

A person may not operate a nontank vessel within the waters of the state or cause or permit the transfer of oil to or from a nontank vessel unless the person has furnished to the department and the department has approved proof of financial ability to respond to damages meeting the requirements of AS

46.04.040

. Proof of financial responsibility required under this subsection is subject to adjustment of dollar amounts under AS

46.04.045

and is established, for a nontank vessel that carries

predominantly persistent product, at $300 per incident for each barrel of oil storage capacity on the vessel or $5,000,000, whichever is greater; and

predominantly nonpersistent product, at $100 per incident for each barrel of oil storage capacity on the vessel or $1,000,000, whichever is greater.

A person may not transport oil by railroad tank car or cause or permit the transfer of oil to or from a railroad tank car unless the person has furnished to the department and the department has approved proof of financial ability to respond to damages meeting the requirements of AS

46.04.040

. Proof of financial responsibility required under this subsection is subject to adjustment of dollar amounts under AS

46.04.045

and is established at

$300 per incident for each barrel of persistent product based on the maximum amount of persistent product storage capacity of any train on the railroad; and

$100 per incident for each barrel of nonpersistent product based upon the maximum amount of nonpersistent product storage capacity of any train on the railroad or $1,000,000, whichever is greater.

For purposes of AS

46.04.030(k)

, response planning standards apply to nontank vessels and railroad tank cars as follows:

for a nontank vessel,

containment and control of 15 percent of the maximum oil capacity of the nontank vessel within 48 hours; and

cleanup of the discharge within the shortest possible time consistent with minimizing damage to the environment; and

for a railroad tank car,

containment and control of 15 percent of the maximum oil capacity of a train on the railroad within 48 hours; and

cleanup of the discharge within the shortest possible time consistent with minimizing damage to the environment.

Notwithstanding the requirements of AS

46.04.040(e)

and (l) and

46.04.047

, for purposes of (a) of this section, an applicant may provide evidence of financial responsibility by proof of entry of the nontank vessel in a protection and indemnity association or proof of coverage with another insurer that

is financially solvent and has a favorable history of claim handling;

provides coverage against pollution risks in at least the amount of the financial responsibility required under (a) of this section without any requirement for a special endorsement;

does not agree to be subject to direct action in court or to appointment of an agent for service of process; and

in the case of a protection and indemnity association or group of insureds, is not authorized by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to sell insurance in the state so long as it is not listed by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development as being disapproved for use in the state.

The requirements of this section do not apply to a nontank vessel operating in the waters of the state if the nontank vessel

is engaged in innocent passage; for purposes of this paragraph, a nontank vessel is engaged in innocent passage if its operation in state waters, irrespective of whether it is a United States or foreign-flag vessel, would constitute innocent passage under the Convention on the Territorial Sea and the Contiguous Zone, April 29, 1958, 15 U.S.T. 1606, or the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea 1982, December 10, 1982, U.N. Publication No. E 83.V.5, 21 I.L.M. 1261 (1982), were the vessel a foreign-flag vessel;

enters state waters because of imminent danger to the crew, or in an effort to prevent an oil spill or other harm to public safety or the environment, and are inapplicable only until the vessel is able to leave state waters as soon as it may do so without imminent risk of harm to the crew, public safety, or the environment; or

enters state waters after the United States Coast Guard has determined that the vessel is in distress, and are inapplicable only until the vessel is able to leave state waters as soon as it may do so without imminent risk of harm to the crew, public safety, or the environment.

On and after May 26, 2003, a person may not operate a nontank vessel within the waters of the state or cause or permit the transfer of oil to or from a nontank vessel unless the department has approved an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan covering that nontank vessel and the person is in compliance with the plan.

The oil discharge prevention and contingency plan for a nontank vessel required by (f) of this section must include

vessel-specific information;

a response plan consisting of

initial notification procedures;

a certification that the applicant for the nontank vessel contingency plan is a member of, or has a contract with, an oil spill response organization that is an oil spill primary response action contractor with a response action plan approved by the department as meeting the response planning standards of (c)(1) of this section for the maximum oil capacity of the nontank vessel; and

a certification that the applicant for the nontank vessel contingency plan has contracted with an oil spill primary response action contractor providing incident management team services; and

a prevention plan certification stating that the nontank vessel for which contingency plan approval is made complies with applicable federal and International Maritime Organization requirements.

In lieu of the requirements

of (g)(2)(B) of this section, a person may comply with the requirement of (g)(2)(B) of this section by demonstrating, to the satisfaction of the department, that the person is maintaining an oil spill response plan and equivalent equipment, personnel, and resources to enable the person to meet the requirements of this section; and

of (g)(2)(C) of this section, a person may comply with the requirement of (g)(2)(C) of this section by demonstrating, to the satisfaction of the department, that the person is maintaining an incident management team in order to implement a planned response to a release or threatened release of oil from its nontank vessel.

The provisions of AS

46.04.030(d)

— (l), (n), (o), and (r) apply to a nontank vessel, to a nontank vessel contingency plan required by this section, and to a person applying for and holding an approved nontank vessel contingency plan.

On and after June 12, 2003, a person may not transport oil by railroad tank car or cause or permit the transfer of oil to or from a railroad tank car unless the department has approved an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan covering the transportation of oil by railroad tank cars by the railroad and the person is in compliance with the plan.

The provisions of AS

46.04.030(d)

— (l), (n), (o), and (r) apply to a railroad tank car, to a railroad tank car contingency plan required by this section, and to a person applying for and holding an approved railroad tank car contingency plan.

The department shall adopt regulations under AS

46.04.070

to implement

the requirements of response planning standards under (c) of this section;

the requirements of (f) — (i) of this section as applicable to nontank vessels; and

the requirements of (j) and (k) of this section as applicable to railroad tank cars.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 2000; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 8 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

Sec. 46.04.060.
Inspections.

In addition to other rights of access or inspection conferred upon the department by law or otherwise, the department may at reasonable times and in a safe manner enter and inspect oil terminal facilities, pipelines, exploration and production facilities, tank vessels, and oil barges in order to

ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter; or

participate in an examination of the structural integrity and the operating and mechanical systems of those vessels, barges, pipelines, and facilities by federal and state agencies with jurisdiction.

When the department determines that no federal or state agencies with jurisdiction are performing timely and adequate inspections of an oil terminal facility, pipeline, exploration or production facility, tank vessel, or oil barge, it may perform its own inspection of the structural integrity and operating and mechanical systems of a facility, pipeline, tank vessel, or oil barge by using personnel with qualifications in the areas being inspected.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am §§ 21, 22 ch 191 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 46.04.065.
Compliance verification for nontank vessels and for trains and related facilities and operations.

In addition to other rights of access or examination conferred upon the department by law or otherwise, to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter relating to oil pollution control, the department may at reasonable times and in a safe manner enter and examine

nontank vessels; and

trains, railroad tracks, associated facilities, and railroad operations.

History.

(§ 9 ch 8 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 46.04.070.
Scope of regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and that do not conflict with and are not preempted by federal law or regulations.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

Sec. 46.04.080.
Catastrophic oil discharges.

The commissioner or the adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may request the governor to determine that an actual or imminent occurrence of a catastrophic oil discharge constitutes a disaster emergency under AS 26.23. The commissioner and the adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall respond appropriately in the relief of the actual or imminent discharge under the relevant provisions of the applicable incident command system.

The department shall promptly, under AS

46.04.010

, seek reimbursement of oil discharge cleanup or containment expenses incurred as a result of an actual or imminent catastrophic oil discharge under AS

26.23.050

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1993; am § 47 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 56 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For state master contingency plan, see AS

46.04.200

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (a), twice substituted “commissioner” for “commissioner of environmental conservation”.

Sec. 46.04.090.
Oil discharge cleanup personnel, equipment, expenses.

The department, when feasible, shall enter into contracts with persons or private organizations to provide the personnel, equipment, or other services or supplies that may be required to carry out this chapter. Contracts under this section are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). When private contracting is not feasible, the department may establish and maintain at ports, harbors, or other locations in the state, the cleanup personnel, equipment, and supplies that, in its judgment, are necessary to carry out this chapter. When exercising its authority under this subsection, the department shall coordinate with the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs to avoid duplication of efforts.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 54 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 190 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former subsection (b) was renumbered as AS

46.03.890(b)

in 1991, at which time the subsection designation of former (a) was deleted.

Sec. 46.04.100.
Compacts authorized.

The governor may execute supplementary agreements, reciprocal arrangements, or compacts with any other state or country, subject to the approval, if required by the United States Constitution, of the Congress of the United States, for the purpose of implementing this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980)

Sec. 46.04.110.
Municipal powers limited.

If a conflict occurs between a provision of this chapter, or a regulation, order, decision, or other determination of the department under this chapter, and a charter, ordinance, permit, regulation, franchise, decision, or other determination of a municipality, the provisions of this chapter or the regulation, order, decision, or other determination of the department prevail. However, nothing in this chapter precludes a municipality, by ordinance or regulation, from exercising its police powers in the area regulated by this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

Sec. 46.04.120.

[Renumbered as AS 46.04.900.]